Utah statutes.
53B-8a-105.   Additional powers of board as to the Utah Educational Savings
Plan Trust.
The board has all powers necessary to carry out and effectuate the purposes,
objectives, and provisions of this chapter pertaining to the Utah Educational
Savings Plan Trust, including the power to:
(1)  engage:
(a)  one or more investment advisors, registered under the Investment Advisers
Act of 1940, with at least 5,000 advisory clients and at least $1,000,000,000
under management, to provide investment advice to the board with respect to
the assets held in each account;
(b)  an administrator to perform recordkeeping functions on behalf of the Utah
Educational Savings Plan Trust; and
(c)  a custodian for the safekeeping of the assets of the Utah Educational
Savings Plan Trust;
(2)  carry out studies and projections in order to advise account owners
regarding present and estimated future higher education costs and levels of
financial participation in the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust required in
order to enable account owners to achieve their educational funding objective;
(3)  contract for goods and services and engage personnel as necessary,
including consultants, actuaries, managers, counsel, and auditors for the
purpose of rendering professional, managerial, and technical assistance and
advice, all of which contract obligations and services shall be payable from
any moneys of the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust;
(4)  participate in any other way in any federal, state, or local governmental
program for the benefit of the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust;
(5)  promulgate, impose, and collect administrative fees and charges in
connection with transactions of the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust, and
provide for reasonable service charges, including penalties for cancellations
and late payments;
(6)  procure insurance against any loss in connection with the property,
assets, or activities of the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust;
(7)  administer the funds of the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust;
(8)  solicit and accept for the benefit of the endowment fund gifts, grants,
and other moneys, including general fund moneys from the state and grants from
any federal or other governmental agency;
(9)  procure insurance indemnifying any member of the board from personal loss
or accountability arising from liability resulting from a member's action or
inaction as a member of the board; and
(10)  make rules and regulations for the administration of the Utah
Educational Savings Plan Trust.
